Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1532
Aiding and abetting ineligible voter; penalty.

Any person who procures, aids, assists, counsels, or advises another to give his or her vote, knowing that such other person is not a resident of this state or a registered voter of the county as required by law at the time of election, is not of the constitutionally prescribed age of a registered voter, is not a citizen of the United States, or is not duly qualified as a result of any other disability to vote at the place where and the time when the vote is to be given shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 431.